North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 15. Streets, Traffic and Parking.
§ 160A-303.2.
Regulation of abandonment of junked motor vehicles.

A municipality may by ordinance regulate, restrain or prohibit the abandonment of junked motor vehicles on public grounds and on private property within the municipality’s ordinance-making jurisdiction upon a finding that such regulation, restraint or prohibition is necessary and desirable to promote or enhance community, neighborhood or area appearance, and may enforce any such ordinance by removing or disposing of junked motor vehicles subject to the ordinance according to the procedures prescribed in this section. The authority granted by this section shall be supplemental to any other authority conferred upon municipalities. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a municipality to require the removal or disposal of a motor vehicle kept or stored at a bona fide “automobile graveyard” or “junkyard” as defined in

G.S. 136-143

.For purposes of this section, the term “junked motor vehicle” means a vehicle that does not display a current license plate and that:

Is partially dismantled or wrecked; or

Cannot be self-propelled or moved in the manner in which it originally was intended to move; or

Is more than five years old and appears to be worth less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or is more than five years old and appears to be worth less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) as provided by the municipality in an ordinance adopted under this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-97, s. 2, effective October 1, 2009.

(a1)

Any junked motor vehicle found to be in violation of an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section may be removed to a storage garage or area, but no such vehicle shall be removed from private property without the written request of the owner, lessee, or occupant of the premises unless the council or a duly authorized city official or employee finds in writing that the aesthetic benefits of removing the vehicle outweigh the burdens imposed on the private property owner. Such finding shall be based on a balancing of the monetary loss of the apparent owner against the corresponding gain to the public by promoting or enhancing community, neighborhood or area appearance. The following, among other relevant factors, may be considered:

(1)

Protection of property values;

(2)

Promotion of tourism and other economic development opportunities;

(3)

Indirect protection of public health and safety;

(4)

Preservation of the character and integrity of the community; and

Promotion of the comfort, happiness, and emotional stability of area residents.

(a2)

The city may require any person requesting the removal of a junked or abandoned motor vehicle from private property to indemnify the city against any loss, expense, or liability incurred because of the removal, storage, or sale thereof. When an abandoned or junked motor vehicle is removed, the city shall give notice to the owner as required by G.S. 20-219.11(a) and (b).

(a3)

Hearing Procedure. —

Regardless of whether a city does its own removal and disposal of motor vehicles or contracts with another person to do so, the city shall provide a prior hearing procedure for the owner. For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in

G.S. 20-219.9

apply.

(1)

If the city operates in such a way that the person who tows the vehicle is responsible for collecting towing fees, all provisions of Article 7A, Chapter 20, apply.

(2)

If the city operates in such a way that it is responsible for collecting towing fees, it shall:

Provide by contract or ordinance for a schedule of reasonable towing fees,

Provide a procedure for a prompt fair hearing to contest the towing,

Provide for an appeal to district court from that hearing,

Authorize release of the vehicle at any time after towing by the posting of a bond or paying of the fees due, and

Provide a sale procedure similar to that provided in

G.S. 44A-4

, 44A-5, and 44A-6, except that no hearing in addition to the probable cause hearing is required. If no one purchases the vehicle at the sale and if the value of the vehicle is less than the amount of the lien, the city may destroy it.

(a4)

Any person who removes a vehicle pursuant to this section shall not be held liable for damages for the removal of the vehicle to the owner, lienholder or other person legally entitled to the possession of the vehicle removed; however, any person who intentionally or negligently damages a vehicle in the removal of such vehicle, or intentionally or negligently inflicts injury upon any person in the removal of such vehicle, may be held liable for damages.

Any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall include a prohibition against removing or disposing of any motor vehicle that is used on a regular basis for business or personal use.

History.

1983, c. 841, s. 2; 1985, c. 737, s. 2; 1987, c. 42, s. 2; c. 451, s. 2; 1989, c. 3; c. 743, s. 2; 2005-10, ss. 2, 3; 2006-15, s. 3; 2006-166, s. 2; 2006-171, s. 1; 2007-208, s. 2; 2007-505, s. 3; 2009-97, s. 2.

Local Modification.

City of Albemarle: 2002-80, s. 1; city of Greenville: 1998-80; 2004-30, s. 1; city of Henderson: 2004-30, s. 1; city of Jacksonville: 2005-25, s. 1 (as to subsection (a)); city of Lumberton: 1995, c. 53, ss. 1, 2; city of Winston-Salem: 2000-104, s. 2; town of Matthews: 2004-30, s. 2; 2005-24, s. 1; town of Waynesville: 2004-30, s. 1.

§ 160A-304.
Regulation of taxis.

A city may by ordinance license and regulate all vehicles operated for hire in the city. The ordinance may require that the drivers and operators of taxicabs engaged in the business of transporting passengers for hire over the public streets shall obtain a license or permit from the city; provided, however, that the license or permit fee for taxicab drivers shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00). As a condition of licensure, the city may require an applicant for licensure to pass a controlled substance examination. The ordinances may also specify the types of taxicab services that are legal in the municipality; provided, that in all cases shared-ride services as well as exclusive-ride services shall be legal. Shared-ride service is defined as a taxi service in which two or more persons with either different origins or with different destinations, or both, occupy a taxicab at one time. Exclusive-ride service is defined as a taxi service in which the first passenger or party requests exclusive use of the taxicab. In the event the applicant is to be subjected to a national criminal history background check, the ordinance shall specifically authorize the use of FBI records. The ordinance shall require any applicant who is subjected to a national criminal history background check to be fingerprinted.The Department of Public Safety may provide a criminal record check to the city for a person who has applied for a license or permit through the city. The city shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The applicant’s fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State’s criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The city shall keep all information pursuant to this subsection privileged, in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and the information shall be confidential and shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks of criminal history records authorized by this subsection.The following factors shall be deemed sufficient grounds for refusing to issue a permit or for revoking a permit already issued:

Conviction of a felony against this State, or conviction of any offense against another state which would have been a felony if committed in this State;

Violation of any federal or State law relating to the use, possession, or sale of alcoholic beverages or narcotic or barbiturate drugs;

Addiction to or habitual use of alcoholic beverages or narcotic or barbiturate drugs;

Violation of any federal or State law relating to prostitution;

Noncitizenship in the United States;

Habitual violation of traffic laws or ordinances.

The ordinance may also require operators and drivers of taxicabs to display prominently in each taxicab, so as to be visible to the passengers, the city taxi permit, the schedule of fares, a photograph of the driver, and any other identifying matter that the council may deem proper and advisable. The ordinance may also establish rates that may be charged by taxicab operators, may limit the number of taxis that may operate in the city, and may grant franchises to taxicab operators on any terms that the council may deem advisable.

When a city ordinance grants a taxi franchise for operation of a stated number of taxis within the city, the holder of the franchise shall report at least quarterly to the council the average number of taxis actually in operation during the preceding quarter. The council may amend a taxi franchise to reduce the number of authorized vehicles by the average number not in actual operation during the preceding quarter, and may transfer the unused allotment to another franchised operator. Such amendments of taxi franchises shall not be subject to

G.S. 160A-76

. Allotments of taxis among franchised operators may be transferred only by the city council, and it shall be unlawful for any franchised operator to sell, assign, or otherwise transfer allotments under a taxi franchise.

Nothing in this Chapter authorizes a city to adopt an ordinance doing any of the following with respect to a TNC service regulated under Article 10A of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes:

Requiring licensing or regulating.

through (5) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-237, s. 6, effective October 1, 2015.

(6)

Requiring or prohibiting taxi franchises or taxi operators from contracting with a transportation network company regulated under Article 10A of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

History.

1943, c. 639, s. 1; 1945, c. 564, s. 2; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 606, s. 5; c. 747, s. 66; 1987, c. 777, s. 7; 2002-147, s. 14; 2003-65, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 12.1(b); 2014-100, s. 17.1(o); 2014-115, s. 17; 2015-237, s. 6.

§ 160A-305.
Agreements under National Highway Safety Act.

Any city is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with the State of North Carolina and its agencies, and with the federal government and its agencies, to secure the full benefits available to the city under the National Highway Safety Act of 1966, and to cooperate with State and federal agencies, other public and private agencies, interested organizations, and individuals, to effectuate the purposes of the act and subsequent amendments thereof.

History.

1967, c. 1255; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-306.
Building setback lines.

A city shall have authority to (i) classify all or a portion of the streets in the city according to their size, present and anticipated traffic loads, and other characteristics relevant to the achievement of the purposes of this section, and (ii) establish by ordinance minimum distances that buildings and other permanent structures or improvements constructed along each class or type of street shall be set back from the right-of-way line or the center line of an existing or proposed street. Portions of any street may be classified in a manner different from other portions of the same street where the characteristics of the portions differ.

Any setback line shall be designed:

To promote the public safety by providing adequate sight distances for persons using the street and its sidewalks, lessening congestion in the street and sidewalks, facilitating the safe movement of vehicular and pedestrian traffic on the street and sidewalks and providing adequate fire lanes between buildings.

To protect the public health by keeping dwellings and other structures an adequate distance from the dust, noise, and fumes created by traffic on the street and by insuring an adequate supply of light and air.

To provide that, notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, measurements for sight distances at street intersections, including sight triangles, must begin within the roadway or edge of pavement of a proposed or existing street.

A setback-line ordinance shall permit affected property owners to appeal to the council for variance or modification of setback requirements as they apply to a particular piece of property. The council may vary or modify the requirements upon a showing that

The peculiar nature of the property results in practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships that impede carrying out the strict letter of the requirement.

The property will not yield a reasonable return or cannot be put to reasonable use unless relief is granted, and

Balancing the public interest in enforcing the setback requirements and the interest of the owner, the grant of relief is required by considerations of justice and equity.

In granting relief, the council may impose reasonable and appropriate conditions and safeguards to protect the interest of neighboring properties. The council may delegate authority to hear appeals under setback-line ordinances to any authorized body to hear appeals under zoning ordinances. If this is done, appeal to the council from the board shall be governed by the same laws and rules as appeals from decisions granting or denying variances or modifications under the zoning ordinance.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1987, c. 747, ss. 13, 14; 2021-121, s. 3(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-121, s. 3(a), effective August 30, 2021, in subsection (b), added subdivision (b)(3) and made stylistic changes.

§ 160A-307.
Curb cut regulations.

A city may by ordinance regulate the size, location, direction of traffic flow, and manner of construction of driveway connections into any street or alley. The ordinance may require the construction or reimbursement of the cost of construction and public dedication of medians, acceleration and deceleration lanes, and traffic storage lanes for driveway connections into any street or alley if all of the following apply:

The need for such improvements is reasonably attributable to the traffic using the driveway.

The improvements serve the traffic of the driveway.

No street or alley under the control of the Department of Transportation may be improved without the consent of the Department of Transportation. A city shall not require the applicant to acquire right-of-way from property not owned by the applicant. However, an applicant may voluntarily agree to acquire such right-of-way.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1987, c. 747, s. 16; 2019-111, s. 1.16.

§ 160A-307.1.
Limitation on city requirements for street improvements related to schools.

A city may only require street improvements related to schools that are required for safe ingress and egress to the municipal street system and that are physically connected to a driveway on the school site. The required improvements shall not exceed those required pursuant to G.S. 136-18(29).

G.S. 160A-307

shall not apply to schools. A city may only require street improvements related to schools as provided in G.S. 160A-372. The cost of any improvements to the municipal street system pursuant to this section shall be reimbursed by the city. Any agreement between a school and a city to make improvements to the municipal street system shall not include a requirement for acquisition of right-of-way by the school, unless the school is owned by an entity that has eminent domain power. Any right-of-way costs incurred by a school for required improvements pursuant to this section shall be reimbursed by the city. Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, a city may not condition the approval of any zoning, rezoning, or permit request on the waiver or reduction of any provision of this section. The term “school,” as used in this section, means any facility engaged in the educational instruction of children in any grade or combination of grades from kindergarten through the twelfth grade at which attendance satisfies the compulsory attendance law and includes charter schools authorized under

G.S. 115C-218.5

.

History.

2017-57, s. 34.6A(b); 2017-197, s. 7.5; 2018-5, s. 34.18(a); 2018-97, s. 7.4(a); 2018-114, s. 26.

§ 160A-308.
Regulation of dune buggies.

A municipality may by ordinance regulate, restrict and prohibit the use of dune or beach buggies, jeeps, motorcycles, cars, trucks, or any other form of power-driven vehicle specified by the governing body of the municipality on the foreshore, beach strand and the barrier dune system. Violation of any ordinance adopted by the governing body of a municipality pursuant to this section is a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Provided, a municipality shall not prohibit the use of such specified vehicles from the foreshore, beach strand and barrier dune system by commercial fishermen for commercial activities. Commercial fishermen, however, shall abide by all other regulations or restrictions duly enacted by municipalities under this section.

History.

1973, cc. 856, 1401; 1993, c. 539, s. 1086; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 68; c. 24, s. 14(c).

Local Modification.

Town of Wrightsville Beach: 1989, c. 611, s. 1, as amended by 2005-265, s. 1.

§ 160A-309.
Intersection and roadway improvements.

A city may contract with a developer or property owner, or with a private party who is under contract with the developer or property owner, for public intersection or roadway improvements that are adjacent or ancillary to a private land development project. Such a contract is not subject to Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes if the public cost will not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and the city or its designated agency determines that: (i) the public cost will not exceed the estimated cost of providing for those public intersection or roadway improvements through either eligible force account qualified labor or through a public contract let pursuant to Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes; or (ii) the coordination of separately constructed public intersection or roadway improvements, and the adjacent or ancillary private land development improvements would be impracticable. A city may enact ordinances and policies setting forth the procedures, requirements, and terms for agreements authorized by this section.

History.

2005-426, s. 8(c).

§ 160A-310.

Reserved for future codification purposes.